xx: Rainforest Alliance Vanilla
de: Rainforest Alliance Vanille
fr: Rainforest Alliance Vanille
nl: Rainforest Alliance Vanille

en: Rainforest Alliance Ginger
xx: Rainforest Alliance Ginger
fr: Rainforest Alliance Gingembre
nl: Rainforest Alliance Gember

en: Rainforest Alliance Coffee
de: Rainforest Alliance Kaffee
fr: Rainforest Alliance Café

en: Rainforest Alliance Cocoa
xx: Rainforest Alliance Cocoa
bg: Rainforest Alliance Какао
de: Rainforest Alliance Kakao
fr: Rainforest Alliance Cacao
nl: Rainforest Alliance Cacao
sv: Rainforest Alliance Kakao

en: Rainforest Alliance Cassave
xx: Rainforest Alliance Cassave

en: Rainforest Alliance Hazelnut
xx: Rainforest Alliance Hazelnut
de: Rainforest Alliance Haselnuss
fr: Rainforest Alliance Noisettes
nl: Rainforest Alliance Hazelnoot
sv: Rainforest Alliance Hasselnöt

en: Rainforest Alliance Bananas
xx: Rainforest Alliance Bananas
de: Rainforest Alliance Banane, Rainforest Alliance Bananen
fr: Rainforest Alliance Bananes

en: Rainforest Alliance Mango
xx: Rainforest Alliance Mango

en: Rainforest Alliance Hazelnut
xx: Rainforest Alliance Hazelnut
nl: Rainforest Alliance Hazelnoot

de: Reinheitsgebot
xx: Reinheitsgebot
es: Ley de pureza de 1516, Reinheitsgebot
fr: Décret sur la pureté de la bière, Reinheitsgebot
it: Decreto di purezza
pt: Reinheitsgebot, Lei da Pureza da Cerveja

en: Rich in vitamin A
xx: Rich in vitamin A
de: Reich an Vitamin A
es: Rico en vitamina A
fi: Runsaasti A-vitamiinia
fr: Riche en vitamine A
he: עשיר בוויטמין A, עתיר בוויטמין A
hr: bogat vitaminom A
hu: A-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina A
pt: Rico en vitamina A

en: Rich in vitamin B
de: Reich an Vitamin B
es: Rico en vitamina B
fi: runsaasti B-vitamiinia
fr: Riche en vitamine B
hr: bogat vitaminom B
hu: B-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina B
pt: Rico en vitamina B

en: Rich in vitamin B1
de: Reich an Vitamin B1
es: Rico en vitamina B1
fi: Runsaasti B1-vitamiinia
fr: Riche en vitamine B1
he: עשיר בוויטמין B1, עתיר בוויטמין B1
hr: bogat vitaminom B1
hu: B1-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina B1
nl: rijk aan vitamine B1
pt: Rico em vitamina B1

en: Rich in vitamin B2
xx: Rich in vitamin B2

en: Rich in vitamin B3
xx: Rich in vitamin B3

en: Rich in vitamin B6
xx: Rich in vitamin B6
de: Reich an Vitamin B6
es: Rico en vitamina B6
fi: Runsaasti B6-vitamiinia
fr: Riche en vitamine B6
he: עשיר בוויטמין B6, עתיר בוויטמין B6, עתיר ויטמין B6
hr: bogat vitaminom B6
hu: B6-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina B6
pt: Rico em vitamina B6

en: high in biotin, high in vitamin b7
xx: high in biotin

en: high in pantothenic acid, high in vitamin b5
xx: high in pantothenic acid

en: high in phosphore
xx: high in phosphore

en: high in iron
xx: high in iron